Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-520
Limitations on liability.

(a) A person is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of:

(1) a protected series of a series limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as:

(A) an associated member, protected-series manager, or protected-series transferee of the protected series; or

(B) a member, manager, or a transferee of the company; or

(2) a series limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as an associated member, protected-series manager, or protected-series transferee of a protected series of the company.

(b) Subject to section 21-523, the following rules apply:

(1) A debt, obligation, or other liability of a series limited liability company is solely the debt, obligation, or liability of the company.

(2) A debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series is solely the debt, obligation, or liability of the protected series.

(3) A series limited liability company is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series of the company solely by reason of the protected series being a protected series of the company or the company:

(A) being or acting as a protected-series manager of the protected series;

(B) having the protected series manage the company; or

(C) owning a protected-series transferable interest of the protected series.

(4) A protected series of a series limited liability company is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the company or another protected series of the company solely by reason of:

(A) being a protected series of the company;

(B) being or acting as a manager of the company or a protected-series manager of another protected series of the company; or

(C) having the company or another protected series of the company be or act as a protected-series manager of the protected series.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 9.